el: Αθλητικά είδη > Υπαίθριες δραστηριότητες αναψυχής > Παιχνίδια εξωτερικού χώρου > Πλατφόρμα & Paddle Tennis: Τσάντες για τένις πλατφόρμας και paddle; Λαβές και ταινίες για τένις πλατφόρμας και paddle; Ρακέτες πλατφόρμας & Paddle Tennis; Παπούτσια για τένις πλατφόρμας και paddle; Μπάλες τένις πλατφόρμας; Φιλέ τένις πλατφόρμας
nl: Sportartikelen > Buitenrecreatie > Buitenspelen > Platform- en paddletennis: Tassen voor platform- en padeltennis; Grips en tape voor platform- en padeltennis; Paddles voor platform- en paddletennis; Schoenen voor platform- en padeltennis; Ballen voor platformtennis; Platformtennisnetten
fr: Équipements sportifs > Loisirs de plein air > Jeux d'extérieur > Paddle-tennis: Sacs de platform tennis et paddle-tennis; Grips et surgrips de platform tennis et paddle-tennis; Raquettes de paddle-tennis; Chaussures de platform tennis et paddle-tennis; Balles de paddle-tennis; Filets de platform tennis
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Poilsis lauke > Lauko žaidimai > Platforminis tenisas ir padelis: Platforminio ir raketinio teniso krepšiai; Platforminio ir paddle teniso rakečių rankenų apvijos ir juostos; Platforminio teniso ir padelio raketės; Platforminio teniso ir padelio batai; Platforminiai teniso kamuoliukai; Platforminio teniso tinklai
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Giải trí ngoài trời > Trò chơi ngoài trời > Quần vợt platform và paddle: Túi đựng vợt quần vợt platform & paddle; Quấn cán vợt quần vợt platform & paddle; Vợt quần vợt platform và paddle; Giày quần vợt platform & paddle; Bóng quần vợt platform; Lưới quần vợt platform
it: Articoli sportivi > Ricreazione outdoor > Giochi all'aperto > Platform tennis e paddle tennis: Borse da platform e paddle tennis; Grip e nastri da platform e paddle tennis; Racchette per platform tennis e paddle tennis; Scarpe da platform e paddle tennis; Palline da platform tennis; Reti da platform tennis
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friluftsliv > Utendørsspill > Platform- og paddletennis: Bager for platform- og padeltennis; Grep og teip for platform- og padeltennis; Racketer til platform- og paddletennis; Sko for platform- og padeltennis; Platformtennisballer; Platform tennis-nett
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividades recreativas no exterior > Jogos de exterior > Padel e ténis em plataforma: Sacos de padel e ténis de plataforma; Grips e fitas para padel e ténis de plataforma; Raquetes de padel e ténis em plataforma; Sapatilhas de padel e ténis de plataforma; Bolas de ténis em plataforma; Redes de padel e ténis de plataforma
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Atividades ao ar livre > Jogos ao ar livre > Tênis de plataforma e padel: Bolsas para platform tennis e padel; Grips e fitas para platform tennis e padel; Raquetes de tênis de plataforma e padel; Tênis para platform tennis e padel; Bolas de tênis de plataforma; Redes para platform tennis
hu: Sportszerek > Szabadtéri kikapcsolódás > Szabadtéri játékok > Platform- és paddle tenisz: Platform és padel tenisz táskák; Platform és padel tenisz markolatok és szalagok; Platform- és paddle tenisz lapátok; Platform és padel tenisz cipők; Platformtenisz-labdák; Platform tenisz hálók
da: Sportsartikler > Friluftsliv > Udendørsspil > Platformtennis og paddletennis: Tasker til platform- og padeltennis; Greb og tape til platform- og padeltennis; Bat til platformtennis og paddletennis; Sko til platform- og padeltennis; Platformtennisbolde; Net til platformtennis
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Ulkoharrasteet > Ulkopelit > Platform-tennis ja padel: Platform- ja paddle-tennislaukut; Platform- ja paddle-tenniksen gripit ja teipit; Platform-tennis- ja padel-mailat; Platform- ja paddle-tenniskengät; Platform-tennis-pallot; Platform-tenniksen verkot
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Rekreacija na otvorenom > Igre na otvorenom > Platformski i paddle tenis: Torbe za platformski i paddle tenis; Hvatovi i trake za platformski i paddle tenis; Reketi za platformski i paddle tenis; Obuća za platformski i paddle tenis; Loptice za platformski tenis; Mreže za platformski tenis
en: Sporting Goods > Outdoor Recreation > Outdoor Games > Platform & Paddle Tennis: Platform & Paddle Tennis Bags; Platform & Paddle Tennis Grips & Tape; Platform & Paddle Tennis Paddles; Platform & Paddle Tennis Shoes; Platform Tennis Balls; Platform Tennis Nets
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Actividades al aire libre > Juegos al aire libre > Pádel: Bolsas para tenis de plataforma y pádel; Grips y cintas para tenis de plataforma y pádel; Palas de pádel; Calzado para tenis de plataforma y pádel; Pelotas de pádel; Redes de tenis de plataforma
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Rekreacija na prostem > Igre na prostem > Platform in paddle tenis: Torbe za platform in paddle tenis; Ročaji in trakovi za platformni tenis in paddle; Loparji za platform in paddle tenis; Čevlji za platform in paddle tenis; Žoge za platform in paddle tenis; Mreže za platform tenis
ja: スポーツ用品 > 屋外レクリエーション > 屋外ゲーム > プラットホームテニス・パドルテニス: プラットフォーム＆パデルテニス用バッグ; プラットフォーム＆パデルテニス用グリップ＆テープ; プラットホームテニス・パドルテニス用ラケット; プラットフォーム＆パデルテニス用シューズ; プラットホームテニス用ボール; プラットフォームテニス用ネット
de: Sportartikel > Outdoor-Aktivitäten > Spiele im Freien > Paddletennis: Taschen für Platform- & Padel-Tennis; Griffe & Tapes für Platform- & Padel-Tennis; Paddletennis-Schläger; Schuhe für Platform- & Padel-Tennis; Paddletennis-Bälle; Platform-Tennisnetze
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 户外休闲 > 户外游戏 > 平台网球/板网球: 平台网球与板式网球包; 平台网球与板式网球握把胶带; 平台网球/板网球球拍; 平台网球和板网球鞋; 平台网球用球; 平台网球网
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Outdoorové aktivity > Zahradní a venkovní hry > Pálkový tenis: Tašky na platform a padel tenis; Omotávky a pásky na platform a padel tenis; Pálky na pálkový tenis; Boty na platform a padel tenis; Míčky na pálkový tenis; Sítě na platform tenis
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Recreere în aer liber > Jocuri în aer liber > Tenis de platformă și padel: Genți pentru platform tennis și paddle tennis; Gripuri și bandă pentru tenis cu platformă și padelă; Palete pentru tenis de platformă și padel; Încălțăminte pentru platform tennis și paddle tennis; Mingi pentru tenis de platformă; Plase pentru tenis pe platformă
ko: 스포츠용품 > 야외 레크레이션 > 야외 놀이 > 플랫폼/패들 테니스: 플랫폼 및 패들 테니스 가방; 플랫폼 및 패들 테니스 그립 및 테이프; 플랫폼/패들 테니스 패들; 플랫폼 및 패들 테니스화; 플랫폼 테니스 공; 플랫폼 테니스 네트
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Rekreacja na świeżym powietrzu > Gry na świeżym powietrzu > Tenis łopatkowy i platformowy: Torby do platform i paddle tennis; Owijki i taśmy do platform i paddle tennis; Rakiety do tenisa łopatkowego i platformowego; Buty do platform i paddle tennis; Piłki do tenisa platformowego; Siatki do platform tennis
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Exteriérové rekreakčné športy > Exteriérové hry > Platformový a paddle tenis: Tašky na platformový a paddle tenis; Rukoväte a pásky na rakety na platformový tenis; Rakety pre platformový a paddle tenis; Obuv na platformový a paddle tenis; Loptičky pre platformový a paddle tenis; Siete na platformový tenis
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > สันทนาการกลางแจ้ง > เกมกลางแจ้ง > แพลตฟอร์มและแพดเดิลเทนนิส: กระเป๋าแพลตฟอร์มเทนนิสและแพดเดิลเทนนิส; กริปและเทปพันด้ามแพลตฟอร์มเทนนิสและแพดเดิลเทนนิส; ไม้ตีสำหรับแพลตฟอร์มและแพดเดิลเทนนิส; รองเท้าแพลตฟอร์มเทนนิสและแพดเดิลเทนนิส; ลูกบอลสำหรับแพลตฟอร์มเทนนิส; ตาข่ายแพลตฟอร์มเทนนิส
sv: Sportartiklar > Utomhusaktiviteter > Utomhuslek > Platform tennis och paddle tennis: Väskor för plattforms- och padeltennis; Grepp och tejp för plattforms- och padeltennis; Racketar för platform tennis och paddle tennis; Skor för plattforms- och padeltennis; Bollar för platform tennis; Nät för plattformstennis
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания на открито > Игри на открито > Тенис на платформа и падъл тенис: Чанти за тенис на платформа и падъл тенис; Захвати и ленти за тенис на платформа и падъл тенис; Ракети за тенис на платформа и падъл тенис; Обувки за тенис на платформа и падъл тенис; Топки за тенис на платформа; Мрежи за тенис на платформа
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Açık Hava Etkinlikleri > Açık Hava Sporları > Platform ve Paddle Tenis: Platform ve paddle tenis çantaları; Platform ve paddle tenis gripleri ve bantları; Platform ve Paddle Tenis Raketleri; Platform ve paddle tenis ayakkabıları; Platform Tenis Topları; Platform tenisi fileleri
ru: Спортивные товары > Активный отдых на открытом воздухе > Игры на открытом воздухе > Теннис на платформе и паддл-теннис: Сумки для платформенного и падел-тенниса; Обмотки и ленты для ракеток платформенного и падел-тенниса; Ракетки для тенниса на платформе и паддл-тенниса; Обувь для платформенного и падел-тенниса; Мячи для тенниса на платформе; Сетки для платформенного тенниса
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 室外休閒 > 戶外遊戲 > 板網球: 平台網球與板網球袋; 平台網球與板網球握把與纏帶; 板網球球拍; 平台網球與板網球鞋; 板網球用球; 平台網球網